District of Columbia statutes.
46-357.05

Direct request.

(a)

A petitioner may file a direct request seeking establishment or modification of a support order or determination of parentage of a child. In the proceeding, the law of the District applies.

(b)

A petitioner may file a direct request seeking recognition and enforcement of a support order or support agreement. In the proceeding, §§ 46-357.06 through 46-357.13 apply.

(c)

In a direct request for recognition and enforcement of a Convention support order or foreign support agreement:

(1)

A security, bond, or deposit is not required to guarantee the payment of costs and expenses; and

(2)

An obligee or obligor that in the issuing country has benefited from free legal assistance is entitled to benefit, at least to the same extent, from any free legal assistance provided for by the law of the District under the same circumstances.

(d)

A petitioner filing a direct request is not entitled to assistance from the Office of the Attorney General.

(e)

This subchapter does not prevent the application of laws of the District that provide simplified, more expeditious rules regarding a direct request for recognition and enforcement of a foreign support order or foreign support agreement.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 705, 63 DCR 222